pt-PT: Tipo de saída do tubo fluorescente: Alto rendimento (AR); Arranque imediato; Arranque rápido; Fino; Saída padrão; Ultra Alto Rendimento (UHO); Altíssimo rendimento (VHO); Outro
nl: Type fluorescentiebuis-output: Hoog vermogen (HO); Directe start; Snelstart; Slimline; Standaardvermogen; Ultra hoog vermogen (UHO); Zeer hoog vermogen (VHO); Overig
ja: 蛍光灯の出力タイプ: 高出力（HO）; インスタントスタート; 急速スタート; スリムライン; 標準出力; 超高出力（UHO）; 高出力（VHO）; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta izhoda fluorescentne cevi: Visoka izhodna moč (HO); Takojšen zagon; Hitri zagon; Tanki; Standardni izhod; Ultra visoka izhodna moč (UHO); Zelo visok izhod (VHO); Druga
pl: Typ wyjścia świetlówki: Wysoka wydajność; Natychmiastowy zapłon; Szybki start; Smukłe; Standardowa wydajność; Ultrawysoka wydajność (UHO); Bardzo wysoka wydajność (VHO); Pozostałe
cs: Typ zářivky podle výkonu: Vysoký světelný výkon (HO); Okamžitý start; Rychlý start; Štíhlý profil; Standardní světelný výkon; Ultra vysoký světelný výkon (UHO); Velmi vysoký světelný výkon (VHO); Jiné
it: Tipo di uscita del tubo fluorescente: Alta potenza (HO); Avvio immediato; Avvio rapido; Sottile; Uscita standard; Uscita ultra elevata (UHO); Uscita molto alta (VHO); Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta izlaza fluorescentne cijevi: Visoki učinak (HO); Instant početak; Brzi početak; Tanki; Standardni učinak; Iznimno visoki učinak (UHO); Vrlo visoki učinak (VHO); Ostalo
sv: Utgångstyp för lysrör: Hög effekt (HO); Omedelbar start; Snabbstart; Slimmad; Standardutgång; Ultrahög effekt (UHO); Mycket hög effekt (VHO); Övrigt
lt-LT: Liuminescencinės lempos išėjimo tipas: Didelės galios (HO); Momentinis paleidimas; Greitas startas; Plonas; Standartinė išvestis; Itin didelis našumas (UHO); Labai didelis išėjimo signalas (VHO); Kita
ko: 형광등 출력 유형: 고출력(HO); 즉시 점등; 신속 점등; 슬림라인; 표준 출력; 초고출력(UHO); 매우 높은 출력(VHO); 기타
sk-SK: Typ výstupu žiarivky: Vysoký výkon (HO); Okamžitý štart; Rýchly štart; Tenký; Štandardný výkon; Ultra vysoký výkon (UHO); Veľmi vysoký výkon (VHO); Iné
de: Ausgabetyp der Leuchtstoffröhre: Hohe Leistung (HO); Sofortstart; Schnellstart; Schlank; Standardausgang; Ultrahohe Leistung (UHO); Sehr hohe Leistung (VHO); Sonstiges
nb: Output-type for lysrør: Høy ytelse (HO); Øyeblikkelig start; Hurtigstart; Slankeprofil; Standardutgang; Ultrahøy ytelse (UHO); Svært høy ytelse (VHO); Annet
tr: Floresan tüp çıkış tipi: Yüksek Çıkış (HO); Anında Başlatma; Hızlı Başlatma; İnce profil; Standart Çıkış; Ultra Yüksek Çıkış (UHO); Çok Yüksek Çıkış (VHO); Diğer
en: Fluorescent tube output type: High Output (HO); Instant Start; Rapid Start; Slimline; Standard Output; Ultra High Output (UHO); Very High Output (VHO); Other
el: Τύπος απόδοσης λαμπτήρα φθορισμού: Υψηλής απόδοσης (HO); Άμεσης έναυσης; Ταχείας έναυσης; Slimline; Τυπικής απόδοσης; Υπερυψηλής απόδοσης (UHO); Πολύ υψηλής απόδοσης (VHO); Άλλο
da: Lysstofrørs lysudgangstype: Høj effekt (HO); Øjeblikkelig start; Hurtigstart; Slimline; Standard output; Ultrahøjt output (UHO); Meget højt output (VHO); Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de saída do tubo fluorescente: Alto rendimento (HO); Início instantâneo; Início Rápido; Linha fina; Saída padrão; Ultra Alto Rendimento (UHO); Altíssimo rendimento (VHO); Outro
th: ประเภทเอาต์พุตของหลอดฟลูออเรสเซนต์: กำลังส่องสว่างสูง (HO); แบบติดทันที; แบบสตาร์ทเร็ว; แบบบาง; กำลังส่องสว่างมาตรฐาน; กำลังส่องสว่างสูงพิเศษ (UHO); กำลังส่องสว่างสูงมาก (VHO); อื่นๆ
fr: Type de rendement lumineux du tube fluorescent: Haut rendement (HO); Démarrage instantané; Démarrage rapide; Mince; Rendement standard; Ultra haut rendement (UHO); Très haut rendement (VHO); Autre
bg-BG: Тип изход за флуоресцентна тръба: Висока мощност (HO); Незабавен старт; Бърз старт; Тънък; Стандартен изход; Свръхвисок интензитет (UHO); Много висок интензитет (VHO); Друго
vi: Loại công suất đầu ra của bóng đèn huỳnh quang: Hiệu suất cao (HO); Khởi động tức thì; Khởi động nhanh; Siêu mỏng; Công suất tiêu chuẩn; Công suất cực cao (UHO); Công suất rất cao (VHO); Khác
es: Tipo de salida del tubo fluorescente: Alto rendimiento (HO); Inicio instantáneo; Inicio rápido; Delgado; Salida estándar; Potencia Ultraalta (UHO); Potencia muy alta (VHO); Otros
ru: Тип светового потока люминесцентной лампы: Высокая производительность (HO); Мгновенный запуск; Быстрый запуск; Тонкие трубки; Стандартный вывод; Сверхвысокая мощность (UHO); Очень высокая производительность (VHO); Другое
zh-TW: 螢光燈管輸出類型: 高輸出 (HO); 瞬時啟動; 快速啟動; 細長型; 標準輸出; 超高輸出 (UHO); 超高輸出 (VHO); 其他
zh-CN: 荧光灯管输出类型: 高输出 (HO); 瞬时启动; 快速启动; 细长管型; 标准输出; 超高输出型 (UHO); 超高输出 (VHO); 其他
ro-RO: Tip de ieșire a tubului fluorescent: Putere mare de ieșire (HO); Pornire instantanee; Pornire rapidă; Subțire; Ieșire standard; Putere ultraînaltă (UHO); Putere foarte mare de ieșire (VHO); Altele
hu: Fénycső kimenet típusa: Nagy teljesítményű (HO); Azonnali indítás; Gyorsindítás; Vékony; Standard kimenet; Ultra nagy teljesítményű (UHO); Nagyon nagy teljesítményű (VHO); Egyéb
fi: Loisteputken valotehon tyyppi: Suuri teho (HO); Välitön käynnistys; Pikakäynnistys; Kapeaprofiilinen; Vakiolähtö; Erittäin korkea teho (UHO); Hyvin korkea teho (VHO); Muu